Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Chapter 6. Virginia Airports Authority.

§§ 5.1-56 through 5.1-76.

Repealed by Acts 1980, c. 750.

Cross references.

For present sections covering the subject matter of the repealed sections, see §§ 5.1-2.5 through 5.1-2.24.

As to the Virginia Aviation Board as successor to the Virginia Airports Authority, see § 5.1-2.23.